dictsource/uz_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Uzbek language

.replace
// Replace Cyrrilic script to Latin script
    а    a
    б    b
    ц    c
    д    d
    е    e
    э    e
    ф    f
    г    g
    ҳ    h
    и    i
    ж    j
    к    k
    л    l
    м    m
    н    n
    о    o
    п    p
    қ    q
    р    r
    с    s
    т    t
    у    u
    в    v
    х    x
    й    y
    з    z
    ў    ó
    ғ    ǵ
    ш    š
    ч    ç
    ю    ju  
    я    ja
    ь    ʼ   
    ъ    ʼ 

// Replace left single quotation mark to  modifier letter turned comma 
    ‘    ʻ     

.group a
    a    a

.group b
    b    b

.group c
    c     ts
    ch    tS

.group d
    d    d

.group e
    e    e

.group f
    f    f

.group g
    g    g

.group h
    h    h

.group i
    i    i

.group j
    j    j

.group k
    k    k

.group l
    l    l

.group m
    m    m

.group n
    n    n
    ng   N

.group o
    o    o

.group p
    p    p

.group q
    q    q

.group r
    r    r

.group s
    s    s
    sh    sh

.group t
    t    t

.group u
    u    u

.group v
    v    v

.group x
    x    X

.group y
    y    j

.group z
    z    z

.group o
    o     o
    oʻ    o

.group g
    g     g
    gʻ    g

.group ʼ
    ʼ     ?

.group
    '     ?
    ʻ     ?
    ó     o:
    ǵ     J
    ş     S
    ç     tS
